hr-HR: Položaj šarki vrata: Lijeva; Upotrebljivo na obje strane; Desna; Gornja strana; Ostalo
ro-RO: Poziția balamalei ușii: Stânga; Reversibil; Dreapta; Sus; Altele
en: Door hinge position: Left; Reversible; Right; Top; Other
nl: Positie van deurscharnier: Links; Omkeerbaar; Rechts; Bovenkant; Overig
fr: Position de la charnière de porte: Gauche; Réversible; Droite; Haut; Autre
ko: 도어 경첩 위치: 왼쪽; 리버시블; 오른쪽; 상단; 기타
sl-SI: Položaj tečajev vrat: Leva; Reverzibilen; Desna; Zgoraj; Druga
es: Posición de las bisagras de la puerta: Izquierda; Reversible; Derecha; Superior; Otros
lt-LT: Durų vyrių padėtis: Kairė; Dvipusis; Dešinė; Viršus; Kita
fi: Oven saranoiden asento: Vasemmalla; Käännettävä; Oikealla; Ylhäällä; Muu
it: Posizione della cerniera della porta: A sinistra; Reversibile; A destra; Parte superiore; Altro
bg-BG: Положение на пантите на вратата: Вляво; Обръщаемо; Вдясно; Горе; Друго
pl: Umiejscowienie zawiasów drzwi: Lewe; Odwracalne; Prawe; Górne; Pozostałe
vi: Vị trí bản lề cửa: Trái; Có thể đảo ngược; Phải; Trên; Khác
nb: Dørhengslets posisjon: Venstre; Reversibel; Høyre; Topp; Annet
sv: Dörrgångjärnets position: Vänster; Vändbar; Höger; Topp; Övrigt
el: Θέση μεντεσέ πόρτας: Αριστερή; Αναστρέψιμη; Δεξιά; Επάνω; Άλλο
tr: Kapı menteşesi konumu: Sol; Çift taraflı; Sağ; Üst; Diğer
ja: ドアヒンジの位置: 左; リバーシブル; 右; 上; その他
cs: Poloha dveřního závěsu: Levá strana; Reverzibilní; Pravá strana; Horní; Jiné
ru: Положение дверной петли: Слева; Перенавешиваемая дверь; Справа; Сверху; Другое
da: Dørhængsels position: Venstre; Vendbar; Højre; Top; Andet
pt-PT: Posição da dobradiça da porta: Esquerda; Reversível; Direita; Superior; Outro
zh-TW: 門鉸鏈位置: 左; 雙向; 右; 頂部; 其他
hu: Ajtózsanér pozíciója: Bal oldali; Átfordítható; Jobb oldali; Fent; Egyéb
sk-SK: Poloha pántov dverí: Vľavo; Obojstranný; Vpravo; Vrch; Iné
de: Türscharnierposition: Links; Umkehrbar; Rechts; Oberseite; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 门铰链的位置: 左侧; 可逆; 右侧; 顶部; 其他
th: ตำแหน่งบานพับประตู: ด้านซ้าย; ใช้ได้สองด้าน; ด้านขวา; ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Posição da dobradiça da porta: Esquerda; Reversível; Direita; Superior; Outro